fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lävistykset ja tatuointi > Lävistystarvikkeet > Lävistysneulat: Kanyylineulat; Iholävistimet
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Piercing & Tätowieren > Piercingbedarf > Piercingnadeln: Kanülennadeln; Hautstanzen
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Piercing e tatuagem > Suprimentos para piercings > Agulhas para piercings: Agulhas de cânula; Punções dérmicas
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Piercing & τατουάζ > Προμήθειες για Piercing > Βελόνες για Piercing: Βελόνες με σωληνίσκο; Εργαλεία διάτρησης δέρματος
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Piercing i tatuaże > Sprzęt do piercingu > Igły do piercingu: Igły do kaniuli; Igły biopsyjne
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Пиърсинг и татуиране > Консумативи за пиърсинг > Игли за пиърсинг: Канюли; Перфоратори за пиърсинг
it: Commercio e industria > Piercing e tatuaggi > Prodotti per piercing > Aghi per piercing: Aghi cannula; Aghi per rimozione del derma
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Piercing și tatuaje > Articole pentru piercing > Ace pentru piercing: Canule; Dispozitiv de găurire piele
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Piercing ve Dövme > Piercing Sarf Malzemeleri > Piercing İğneleri: Kanül İğneleri; Dermal Pançlar
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Piercing en tatoeages > Benodigdheden voor piercings > Naalden voor piercings: Canule-naalden; Dermal punches
sv: Företag och industri > Piercing och tatuering > Piercingutrustning > Piercingnålar: Kanylnålar; Dermala slag
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Piercing i tetoviranje > Pribor za piercing > Igle za piercing: Igle za kanile; Igle za bušenje većih rupa
da: Erhverv og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Piercingudstyr > Piercingnåle: Kanylenåle; Dermale stempler
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Piercing és tetoválás > Piercingkellékek > Piercingtűk: Kanültűk; Dermális lyukasztók
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Tatouages et piercings > Matériel de piercing > Aiguilles de piercing: Aiguilles canules; Poinçons cutanés
es: Economía e industria > Piercings y tatuajes > Instrumentos para piercings > Agujas para piercings: Agujas de cánula; Punzones dérmicos
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Pirsing in tetoviranje > Pripomočki za pirsing > Igle za pirsing: Kanile; Orodja za prebadanje kože
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 人體穿孔和刺青 > 人體穿洞器材 > 穿孔針: 鈍針; 真皮打孔器
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Auskarų vėrimas ir tatuiruotės > Auskarų vėrimo reikmenys > Auskarų vėrimo adatos: Kaniulės adatos; Biopsinės adatos
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Piercing a tetovanie > Piercingové potreby > Piercingové ihly: Kanylové ihly; Prepichovacie pero
ja: ビジネス・産業 > ピアス・タトゥー > ピアス用品 > ピアッサー: カニューレ針; ダーマルパンチ
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Piercing e tatuagens > Artigos para piercing > Agulhas para piercing: Agulhas de cânula; Punções dérmicas
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Пирсинг и татуировка > Товары для пирсинга > Иглы для пирсинга: Катетеры для пирсинга; Панчи для пирсинга
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 피어싱/문신 > 피어싱 용품 > 피어싱 바늘: 캐뉼라 바늘; 피부 펀치
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Xuyên và xăm > Dụng cụ xăm hình > Kim xuyên: Kim ống thông; Đục xỏ khuyên
nb: Forretninger og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Piercingutstyr > Piercingnåler: Kanylenåler; Dermalpuncher
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การเจาะและการสัก > อุปกรณ์เจาะผิวหนัง > เข็มเจาะอนามัย: เข็มแคนนูล่า; ที่เจาะผิวหนัง
en: Business & Industrial > Piercing & Tattooing > Piercing Supplies > Piercing Needles: Cannula Needles; Dermal Punches
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Piercing a tetování > Piercingové potřeby > Piercingové jehly: Kanyly; Dermální punchery
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 穿刺与纹身 > 穿刺用品 > 穿刺针: 套管针; 皮肤穿刺针